Hawaii statutes.
§121-35 Property of State. All
property purchased by the State for the army or air national guard shall be and
remain the property of the State. All property of the United States issued to
the army or air national guard or to the militia shall, for the purpose of this
chapter, and any other similar and applicable law, be deemed to be the property
of the State. [L 1967, c 196, pt of §1; HRS §121-35]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next